Louisiana, session 2026, HB825.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1346.1(introductory paragraph) and (2), 1346.2, 1346.3(A) and
(C), 1346.4, and 1346.5 (A)(1) and (4) and (B)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§1346.1. Definitions
As used in this Section For the purpose of this Subpart, the following terms
have the following meanings definitions apply:
* * *
(2) "Stated value policy" means a residential insurance policy under which
the insured has the option to may declare a stated value for the insured residential
property, which is agreed upon by the insurer as the amount of insurance coverage,
irrespective of the current market replacement cost value of the property.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 825 ENROLLED
§1346.2. Requirement to offer stated Stated value policy offer
A. Insurers offering residential property policies within this state may offer
a stated value policy option to homeowners upon the request of the homeowner or
his authorized agent, allowing for the insurance coverage to be based on a stated
value of the residential property as declared by the homeowner or authorized agent,
rather than solely on the market value of the property the replacement cost value of
the property.
B. Any insurer that offers a stated value policy option to homeowners as
provided in Subsection A of this Section shall prominently disclose stated value
policy offerings in all insurance policy proposals, agreements, and renewal
documents provided to consumers.
§1346.3. Homeowner requirements
A. A homeowner electing a stated value policy shall submit to his insurer a
written payoff statement from the each financial institution or any other entity
holding a mortgage or lien on the property. This statement shall accurately reflect
the outstanding balance or the nature of the mortgage or lien on the homeowner's
property at the time the homeowner applies for or renews an insurance policy. In
addition to the financial statement required in this Subsection, a homeowner shall
also provide to his insurer a mortgage certificate from the clerk of court indicating
the presence or absence of a mortgage on the property.
* * *
C. (1) Before issuing any policy that limits coverage on the residential
property equal to the unpaid principal balance of all mortgage loans on the stated
value policy, the insurer shall obtain a statement signed by insureds which contains
the following notice in boldfaced type no smaller than eighteen-point font:
"YOU ARE ELECTING TO PURCHASE COVERAGE AT A LIMIT THAT
IS EQUAL TO ONLY THE UNPAID PRINCIPAL BALANCE OF THE
MORTGAGE LOANS ON YOUR HOME LESS THAN REPLACEMENT COST.
ACCORDINGLY, IN THE EVENT OF THE TOTAL LOSS OF YOUR HOME OR
A LOSS FOR WHICH THE COST TO REPAIR YOUR HOME EXCEEDS THE
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 825 ENROLLED
UNPAID BALANCE ON YOUR MORTGAGE LOAN COVERAGE PROVIDED
BY THE POLICY, YOU WILL INCUR SIGNIFICANT FINANCIAL LOSSES,
INCLUDING THE POTENTIAL LOSS OF SOME OR ALL OF YOUR HOME'S
EQUITY."
(2) This Subsection shall not be construed to affect coverage under an
insurance policy or create a cause of action against the insurer or the insurer's agent
or representative.
* * *
§ 1346.4. Minimum policy value
An insurer shall not issue a stated value policy for a sum less than the verified
outstanding balance of any all mortgage and liens on the homeowner's property,
ensuring that the insurance coverage adequately reflects the financial obligations
associated with the property.
.§1346.5. Dissemination of information on risks associated with stated value
policies; commissioner
A. To promote consumer awareness within the insurance marketplace, the
commissioner shall provide clear, understandable, and accessible informational
materials to consumers regarding the risks, potential disadvantages, and limitations
associated with stated value policies. At a minimum, the commissioner shall include
the following in informational materials:
(1) A clear explanation of what stated value policies are and how they differ
from other types of property insurance policies, including but not limited to
differences of replacement costs replacement cost policies.
* * *
(4) Consumer tips for evaluating insurance options and understanding policy
terms, including instructions on as to how the consumer may ask questions and seek
clarification from the insurer about the terms and conditions of a stated value policy.
B.(1) The commissioner shall establish a dedicated section on the
department's website for consumers to access the informational materials described
in this Section and shall distribute the informational materials to homeowners at least
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 825 ENROLLED
once every two years through either direct mail, email, or other means deemed
appropriate by the commissioner.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.